Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1115.
do enact as follows:AB1115,11Section 1. 46.10 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,2,6246.10 (1) Liability and the collection and enforcement of such liability for the 3care, maintenance, services, and supplies specified in this section is governed 4exclusively by this section, except in cases of child support ordered by a court under 5s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), or 48.363 (2) or ch. 767 or s. 48.355 (2) 6(b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats.AB1115,27Section 2. 46.10 (14) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,3,9846.10 (14) (e) 1. An order issued under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 1(5m) (a), or 48.363 (2) or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 2stats., for support determined under this subsection constitutes an assignment of 3all commissions, earnings, salaries, wages, pension benefits, income continuation 4insurance benefits under s. 40.62, duty disability benefits under s. 40.65, benefits 5under ch. 102 or 108, and other money due or to be due in the future to the county 6department under s. 46.22 or 46.23 in the county where the order was entered or to 7the department, depending upon the placement of the child as specified by rules 8promulgated under subd. 5. The assignment shall be for an amount sufficient to 9ensure payment under the order.AB1115,310Section 3. 48.33 (4) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB1115,411Section 4. 48.33 (4m) of the statutes is repealed.AB1115,512Section 5. 48.335 (3r) of the statutes is repealed.AB1115,613Section 6. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. of the statutes is repealed.AB1115,714Section 7. 48.357 (5m) of the statutes is repealed.AB1115,815Section 8. 48.36 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB1115,3,191648.36 (4) The county department or the department may refer to the attorney 17responsible for support enforcement under s. 59.53 (6) (a) the name of the parent or 18parents of a child for whom an out-of-home care placement has been ordered under 19s. 48.355 or 48.357 if any of the following conditions exists:AB1115,3,2120(a) The parent’s or parents’ income exceeds 400 percent of the poverty line, as 21defined and revised annually under 42 USC 9902 (2).AB1115,3,2322(b) The parent or parents are receiving adoption assistance under s. 48.975 for 23the child.AB1115,924Section 9. 48.363 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,4,5148.363 (2) If the court revises a dispositional order entered prior to July 1, 22026, with respect to the amount of child support to be paid by a parent for the care 3and maintenance of the parent’s minor child who has been placed by a court order 4under this chapter in a residential, nonmedical facility, the court shall determine 5the liability of the parent in the manner provided in s. 49.345 (14).AB1115,106Section 10. 48.645 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,4,18748.645 (3) Assignment of support. When any person applies for or receives 8aid under this section, any right of the parent or any dependent child to support or 9maintenance from any other person, including any right to unpaid amounts accrued 10at the time of application and any right to amounts accruing during the time aid is 11paid under this section, and a referral for child support is made under s. 48.36 (4) or 12s. 938.36 (4), the child’s right to support is assigned to the state. If a minor who is 13a beneficiary of aid under this section is also the beneficiary of support under a 14judgment or order that includes support for one or more children not receiving aid 15under this section, any support payment made under the judgment or order is 16assigned to the state in the amount that is the proportionate share of the minor 17receiving aid under this section, except as otherwise ordered by the court on the 18motion of a party.AB1115,1119Section 11. 49.345 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,5,22049.345 (1) Liability and the collection and enforcement of such liability for the 21care, maintenance, services, and supplies specified in this section are governed 22exclusively by this section, except in cases of child support ordered by a court under 23s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 (2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 244., 938.357 (5m) (a) (4g) (a), or 938.363 (2) or ch. 767 or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 1stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 2(5m) (a), 2023 stats.AB1115,123Section 12. 49.345 (14) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,5,15449.345 (14) (e) 1. An order issued under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 5(5m) (a), 48.363 (2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 938.357 (5m) (a) (4g) (a), or 6938.363 (2) or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 7938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., for support 8determined under this subsection constitutes an assignment of all commissions, 9earnings, salaries, wages, pension benefits, income continuation insurance benefits 10under s. 40.62, duty disability benefits under s. 40.65, benefits under ch. 102 or 108, 11and other money due or to be due in the future to the county department under s. 1246.215, 46.22, or 46.23 in the county where the order was entered or to the 13department, depending upon the placement of the child as specified by rules 14promulgated under subd. 5. The assignment shall be for an amount sufficient to 15ensure payment under the order.AB1115,1316Section 13. 301.12 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,5,2117301.12 (1) Liability and the collection and enforcement of such liability for the 18care, maintenance, services, and supplies specified in this section is governed 19exclusively by this section, except in cases of child support ordered by a court under 20s. 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), or 938.363 (2) or ch. 767 21or s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats.AB1115,1422Section 14. 301.12 (14) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,6,823301.12 (14) (e) 1. An order issued under s. 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) 24(a), 938.357 (5m) (a), or 938.363 (2) or s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 1(5m) (a), 2023 stats., for support determined under this subsection constitutes an 2assignment of all commissions, earnings, salaries, wages, pension benefits, income 3continuation insurance benefits under s. 40.62, duty disability benefits under s. 440.65, benefits under ch. 102 or 108, and other money due or to be due in the future 5to the county department under s. 46.215, 46.22, or 46.23 in the county where the 6order was entered or to the department, depending upon the placement of the child 7as specified by rules promulgated under subd. 5. The assignment shall be for an 8amount sufficient to ensure payment under the order.AB1115,159Section 15. 767.001 (1) (m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,6,1410767.001 (1) (m) To enforce or revise an order for support entered under s. 1148.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 (2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. 12or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), or 938.363 (2) or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 1348.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 142023 stats.AB1115,1615Section 16. 767.511 (1m) (hm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,6,2216767.511 (1m) (hm) The best interests of the child, including, with respect to a 17child placed with an out-of-home care provider under ch. 48 or 938, the impact on 18the child of expenditures by the family for improvement of any conditions in the 19home that would facilitate the reunification of the child with the child’s family, if 20appropriate, and the importance of a placement that is the least restrictive of the 21rights of the child and the parents and the most appropriate for meeting the needs 22of the child and the family.AB1115,1723Section 17. 767.59 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,7,724767.59 (1) Definition. In this section, “support or maintenance order” 1means a judgment or order providing for child support under this chapter or s. 248.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 (2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. 3or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), 938.363 (2), or 948.22 (7), or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 4stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 5(5m) (a), 2023 stats., for maintenance payments under s. 767.56, for family support 6payments under s. 767.531, 2019 stats., or for the appointment of trustees or 7receivers under s. 767.57 (5).AB1115,188Section 18. 767.59 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,7,149767.59 (2) (c) If the court revises a judgment or order providing for child 10support that was entered under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 11(2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), or 938.363 (2) or s. 1248.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 13stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., the court shall determine child support in 14the manner provided in s. 49.345 (14) or 301.12 (14), whichever is applicable.AB1115,1915Section 19. 767.77 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,8,216767.77 (1) Definition. In this section, “payment obligation” means an 17obligation to pay support under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 18(2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), or 938.363 (2) or s. 1948.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 20stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., support or maintenance under s. 767.501, 21child support or maintenance under s. 767.225, child support under s. 767.511, 22maintenance under s. 767.56, family support under s. 767.225, 2019 stats., or s. 23767.531, 2019 stats., attorney fees under s. 767.241, child support or a child’s health 24care expenses under s. 767.85, paternity obligations under s. 767.804 (3), 767.805 1(4), 767.863 (3), or 767.89, support arrearages under s. 767.71, or child or spousal 2support under s. 948.22 (7).AB1115,203Section 20. 767.78 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,8,104767.78 (1) Definition. In this section, “financial obligation” means an 5obligation for payment incurred under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 48.357 (5m) 6(a), 2023 stats., s. 767.531, 2019 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 7(5m) (a), 2023 stats., or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 (2), 8767.225, 767.241, 767.511, 767.56, 767.61, 767.71, 767.804 (3), 767.805 (4), 767.85, 9767.863 (3), 767.89, 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), or 10938.363 (2).AB1115,2111Section 21. 780.01 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,8,1612780.01 (5) For all arrearages owed by the owner in child support ordered 13under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 48.363 (2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 14(2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), 938.363 (2), or 948.22 (7) or ch. 767 or 769 or s. 1548.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 16stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., or in family support ordered under ch. 767.AB1115,2217Section 22. 893.415 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1115,9,218893.415 (2) An action to collect child or family support owed under a 19judgment or order entered under ch. 767, or to collect child support owed under a 20judgment or order entered under s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 48.357 (5m) (a), 2148.363 (2), 938.183 (4), 938.355 (2) (b) 4. or (4g) (a), 938.357 (5m) (a), 938.363 (2), or 22948.22 (7) or s. 48.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., s. 48.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., s. 23938.355 (2) (b) 4., 2023 stats., or s. 938.357 (5m) (a), 2023 stats., shall be commenced 24within 20 years after the youngest child for whom the support was ordered under 1the judgment or order reaches the age of 18 or, if the child is enrolled full-time in 2high school or its equivalent, reaches the age of 19.AB1115,233Section 23. 938.33 (3) (intro.) and (a) of the statutes are consolidated, 4renumbered 938.33 (3) and amended to read:AB1115,9,175938.33 (3) Correctional placement reports. A report recommending 6placement of a juvenile in a juvenile correctional facility or a secured residential 7care center for children and youth shall be in writing, except that the report may be 8presented orally at the dispositional hearing if the juvenile and the juvenile’s 9counsel consent. A report that is presented orally shall be transcribed and made a 10part of the court record. In addition to the information specified under sub. (1) (a) 11to (d), the report shall include all of the following: (a) A a description of any less 12restrictive alternatives that are available and that have been considered, and why 13they have been determined to be inappropriate. If the court has found that any of 14the conditions specified in s. 938.34 (4m) (b) 1., 2., or 3. applies, the report shall 15indicate that a less restrictive alternative than placement in a juvenile correctional 16facility or a secured residential care center for children and youth is not 17appropriate. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1115 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1115 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1115 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1115 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1115: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting